Washington statutes.
RCW 18.330.070

How referral is made—Contact with providers—Search for violations—Uniform standard for enforcement status.

(1) The agency may choose to provide a referral for the client by either giving the client the name or names of specific providers who may meet the needs of the vulnerable adult identified in the intake form or by giving a provider or providers the name of the client after obtaining the authorization of the client or the client's representative.

(2)(a) Prior to making a referral to a specific provider, the agency shall speak with a representative of the provider and obtain, at a minimum, the following general information, which must be dated and retained in the agency's records:

(i) The type of license held by the provider and license number;

(ii) Whether the provider is authorized by license to provide care to individuals with a mental illness, dementia, or developmental disability;

(iii) Sources of payment accepted, including whether medicaid is accepted;

(iv) General level of medication management services provided;

(v) General level and types of personal care services provided;

(vi) Particular cultural needs that may be accommodated;

(vii) Primary language spoken by care providers;

(viii) Activities typically provided;

(ix) Behavioral problems or symptoms that can or cannot be met;

(x) Food preferences and special diets that can be accommodated; and

(xi) Other special care or services available.

(b) The agency shall update this information regarding the provider at least annually. To the extent practicable, referrals shall be made to providers who appear, in the best judgment of the agency, capable of meeting the vulnerable adult's identified needs.

(3) Prior to making a referral of a supportive housing provider, the agency shall conduct a search, and inform the client that a search was conducted, of the department of social and health service's website to see if the provider is in enforcement status for violation of its licensing regulations. Prior to making a referral of a care services provider, the agency shall conduct a search, and inform the client that a search was conducted, of the department of health's website to determine if the provider is in enforcement status for violation of its licensing regulations. The searches required by this subsection must be considered timely if done within thirty days before the referral. The information obtained by the agency from the searches must be disclosed in writing to the client if the referral includes that provider.

(4) By January 1, 2012, the department of social and health services and the department of health must convene a work group of stakeholders to collaboratively identify and implement a uniform standard for the information pertaining to the enforcement status of a provider that must be disclosed to the client under subsection (3) of this section. The uniform standard must clearly identify what elements of an enforcement action should be included under the disclosure requirements of subsection (3) of this section. Agencies will have no liability or responsibility for the accuracy, completeness, timeliness, or currency of information shared in the prescribed format and are immune from any cause of action rising from their reliance on, use of, or distribution of this information.

[ 2011 c 357 s 8.]